Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 2. JUDICIAL BRANCH

SUBTITLE D. JUDICIAL PERSONNEL AND OFFICIALS

CHAPTER 56. JUDICIAL AND COURT PERSONNEL TRAINING FUND

Sec. 56.001. JUDICIAL AND COURT PERSONNEL TRAINING FUND. (a) The judicial and court personnel training fund is an account in the general revenue fund. Money in the judicial and court personnel training fund may be appropriated only to the court of criminal appeals for the uses authorized in Section 56.003.

(b) On requisition of the court of criminal appeals, the comptroller shall draw a warrant on the fund for the amount specified in the requisition for a use authorized in Section 56.003. A warrant may not exceed the amount appropriated for any one fiscal year.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.78(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 347, Sec. 5, eff. Oct. 1, 1989; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 896, Sec. 1, 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 30.187, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 390, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 31, 1999; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 209, Sec. 85(a)(10), eff. Jan. 1, 2004.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 4 (S.B. 1), Sec. 6.01, eff. September 28, 2011.

Sec. 56.002. FEES COLLECTED BY CLERKS OF COURTS OF APPEALS. Fifty percent of the fees collected by the clerks of the courts of appeals under Section 51.207 shall be deposited in the state treasury in the judicial and court personnel training fund for the continuing legal education of judges and of court personnel.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.78(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 56.003. USE OF FUNDS. (a) Unless the legislature specifically appropriates or provides additional money for purposes of this subsection, the court of criminal appeals may not use more than three percent of the money appropriated in any one fiscal year to hire staff and provide for the proper administration of this chapter.

(b) No more than one-third of the funds appropriated for any fiscal year shall be used for the continuing legal education of judges of appellate courts, district courts, county courts at law, county courts performing judicial functions, full-time associate judges and masters appointed pursuant to Chapter 201, Family Code, and full-time and part-time masters, magistrates, referees, and associate judges appointed pursuant to Chapter 54 or 54A as required by the court of criminal appeals under Section 74.025 and of their court personnel.

(c) No more than one-third of the funds appropriated for any fiscal year shall be used for the continuing legal education of judges of justice courts as required by the court of criminal appeals under Section 74.025 and of their court personnel.

(d) No more than one-third of the funds appropriated for any fiscal year shall be used for the continuing legal education of judges of municipal courts as required by the court of criminal appeals under Section 74.025 and of their court personnel.

(e) The court of criminal appeals shall grant legal funds to statewide professional associations of judges and other entities whose purposes include providing continuing legal education courses, programs, and projects for judges and court personnel. The grantees of those funds must ensure that sufficient funds are available for each judge to meet the minimum educational requirements set by the court of criminal appeals under Section 74.025 before any funds are awarded to a judge for education that exceeds those requirements.

(f) The court of criminal appeals shall grant legal funds to statewide professional associations of prosecuting attorneys, criminal defense attorneys who regularly represent indigent defendants in criminal matters, and justices of the peace, and other entities. The association's or entity's purposes must include providing continuing legal education, technical assistance, and other support programs.

(g) The court of criminal appeals shall grant legal funds to statewide professional associations and other entities that provide innocence training programs related to defendants' claims of factual innocence following conviction to law enforcement officers, law students, and other participants.

(h) The court of criminal appeals shall grant legal funds to statewide professional associations and other entities that provide training to individuals responsible for providing court security.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.78(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 896, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 390, Sec. 3, eff. Aug. 31, 1999; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 654, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 149 (S.B. 496), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 190 (S.B. 42), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 162 (H.B. 598), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 56.004. ALLOCATION OF FUNDS. (a) The legislature shall appropriate funds from the judicial and court personnel training fund to the court of criminal appeals to provide for the continuing legal education of judges and court personnel in this state.

(b) The legislature shall appropriate funds from the judicial and court personnel training fund to the court of criminal appeals to provide for:

(1) continuing legal education, technical assistance, and other support programs for prosecuting attorneys and their personnel, criminal defense attorneys who regularly represent indigent defendants in criminal matters and their personnel, and justices of the peace and their court personnel;

(2) innocence training programs for law enforcement officers, law students, and other participants; and

(3) court security training programs for individuals responsible for providing court security.

(c) An allocation of funds to provide for continuing legal education, technical assistance, and other support programs for the personnel of criminal defense attorneys who regularly represent indigent defendants in criminal matters as described by Subsection (b)(1) must come from the grant of legal funds made by the court of criminal appeals under Section 56.003(f).

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 2, Sec. 8.34(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 896, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 149 (S.B. 496), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 662 (H.B. 1245), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2014.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 190 (S.B. 42), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 56.005. JUDICIAL EDUCATION COMMITTEES. (a) The court of criminal appeals shall appoint the court of criminal appeals education committee to recommend educational requirements and course content, credit, and standards for judges and court personnel of appellate courts, district courts, statutory county courts, and county courts performing judicial functions. The court of criminal appeals shall appoint at least two appellate judges, four district court judges, two statutory county court judges, and one judge of a county court performing judicial functions. The court of criminal appeals may appoint not more than six additional members. Members serve at the will of the court of criminal appeals.

(b) An entity receiving a grant of funds from the court of criminal appeals for the education of justices of the peace and their court personnel shall designate a committee to recommend educational requirements and course content, credit, and standards for the purposes of the grant awarded.

(c) An entity receiving a grant of funds from the court of criminal appeals under this chapter for the education of municipal court judges and their personnel shall designate a committee to recommend educational requirements and course content, credit, and standards for the purposes of the grant awarded.

(d) The court of criminal appeals education committee and any committee established as provided by Subsection (b) or (c) shall meet at least twice a year to:

(1) review and recommend course content, credit, and standards for initial and continuing judicial education for judges and court personnel; and

(2) make recommendations and take other action necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(e) The court of criminal appeals education committee and any committee established as provided by Subsection (b) or (c) shall:

(1) recommend to the court of criminal appeals the minimum educational requirements for judges and court personnel; and

(2) issue an annual report to the court of criminal appeals that lists the courses, credits, and standards for the judges and court personnel.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 2, Sec. 8.34(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 896, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 56.006. RULES; OVERSIGHT. (a) The court of criminal appeals may adopt rules for programs relating to education and training for attorneys, judges, justices of the peace, district clerks, county clerks, law enforcement officers, law students, other participants, and court personnel, including court coordinators, as provided by Section 56.003 and for the administration of those programs, including rules that:

(1) require entities receiving a grant of funds to provide legislatively required training; and

(2) base the awarding of grant funds to an entity on qualitative information about the entity's programs or services and the entity's ability to meet financial performance standards.

(b) The court of criminal appeals, for the proper administration of this chapter and as part of its oversight of training programs for attorneys, judges, justices of the peace, district clerks, county clerks, law enforcement officers, law students, other participants, and court personnel, including court coordinators, as provided by Section 56.003, shall monitor both the financial performance and the program performance of entities receiving a grant of funds under this chapter.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 896, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 718, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 45, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 149 (S.B. 496), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 56.007. ADMINISTRATIVE EXPENSES. An entity receiving a grant of funds from the court of criminal appeals under this chapter for continuing legal education, technical assistance, and other support programs may not use grant funds to pay any costs of the entity not related to approved grant activities.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 896, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.